Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 162.235 is amended to read:
162.235. (1) A  person commits the crime of obstructing governmental or judicial administration
if the person:
(a) Intentionally obstructs, impairs or hinders the administration of law or other governmental
or judicial function by means of intimidation, force, physical or economic interference or obstacle;
(b) With intent to defraud, engages in the business of or acts in the capacity  of a notary public
as defined in ORS 194.215 without having  received a commission as a notary public from the Sec-
retary of State; or
(c) With intent to defraud, engages in the business of or acts in the capacity of an immigration
consultant, as defined in ORS 9.280, in violation of ORS 9.160.
(2)(a) This section [ shall] does not apply to the obstruction of  unlawful governmental or judicial
action or interference with the making of an arrest.
(b) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to the act  of informing another person
of the other person’s civil or constitutional rights.
(3) Obstructing governmental or judicial administration is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 162.245 is amended to read:
162.245. (1) A person commits the offense  of refusing to assist a peace officer if upon command
by a person known  by the person to be a peace officer the person unreasonably refuses or fails to
assist in effecting an authorized arrest or preventing another from committing a crime.
(2) This section does not apply to the act, by itself, of informing  another person of the
other person’s civil or constitutional rights.
[(2)] (3) Refusing to assist a peace officer is a Class B violation.
SECTION 3.  ORS 162.247 is amended to read:
162.247. (1) A person  commits the crime of interfering with a peace officer or parole and pro-
bation officer if the  person, knowing that another person is a peace officer or a parole and probation
officer as defined in ORS 181A.355, intentionally or knowingly acts in a manner that prevents,  or
attempts to prevent, the  peace officer or parole and probation officer from performing the lawful
duties of the officer with regards to another person or a criminal investigation.
(2) Interfering with a peace officer or parole and probation officer is a Class A misdemeanor.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1191 (SB 1191-A) Page 1
(3) This section does not apply :
(a) In situations in which the person is engaging in passive resistance.
(b) To the act of informing another person of the other person’s civil or constitutional
rights.
(4) A person may not be arrested or charged  under this section if the person is arrested or
charged for another offense based on the same conduct.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 162.235, 162.245 and 162.247 by sections 1 to 3 of this
2025 Act apply to conduct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Passed by Senate April 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1191 (SB 1191-A) Page 2